Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB226.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 367.934 TO 367.974 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) An agent that guarantees a price for all merchandise and full performance of all services to be provided
pursuant to a preneed burial contract may collect an administrative fee not to exceed fifteen percent (15%)
of the total amount of all payments to be paid under the contract.
(2) An administrative fee imposed under subsection (1) of this section shall not be collected:
(a) More than once for each executed preneed burial contract regardless of whether the contract is
transferred to a successor entity; or
(b) If the amount to be paid by the purchaser will be paid in installments, until all installments have been
paid.
Section 2. KRS 367.934 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in Section 1 of this Act:
(a) 1. All payments of money made to any person, partnership, association, or corporation upon any
agreement or contract, or any series or combination of agreements or contracts, but not including
the furnishing of cemetery lots or mausoleums, which has for a purpose the furnishing or
performance of funeral services, or the furnishing or delivery of personal property, merchandise,
or services of any nature in connection with the final disposition of a dead human body, for
future use at a time determinable by the death of the person whose body is to be disposed of, are
held to be trust funds.
2. The person, partnership, association, or corporation receiving the payments:
a. Is declared to be the agent thereof;[,] and
b. Shall deposit all payments in a trust account with a bank or trust company or invest
the[said] payments in a savings and loan association or federally chartered credit union.
3. The trustee shall be the financial institution holding the[said] funds.
4. All of the interest, dividends, increases, or accretions of whatever nature earned by the funds
deposited in a trust account shall remain with the principal of such account and become a part
thereof, subject to all of the requirements[regulations] concerning the principal of the
account[said fund] herein contained.
5. a. The agent shall have the authority at any time to transfer or redesignate the trustee of
the[said] funds in his or her discretion upon notification to the Attorney General.
b. In case of any transfer, the former trustee shall transfer funds directly to and payable to
the newly designated trustee or its representative;[.]
(b)[(2)] All payments made to the agent under the agreement, contract, or plan are and shall remain trust
funds with the financial institution until the death of the person for whose service the funds were paid
and until the delivery of all merchandise and full performance of all services called for by the
agreement, contract, or plan, except where payment is made pursuant to a request for refund; and[.]
(c) 1.[(3)] The funds shall not be paid by the financial institution until:
a. A certified statement is furnished to the financial institution by the agent setting forth that
all of the terms and conditions of the agreement have been fully performed by the person,
association, partnership, firm, or corporation; and
b. The agent has proven the death of the person for whose service the funds were paid by
furnishing the financial institution with a verified or certified copy of a record verifying
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
the death, issued by the state registrar of the Vital Statistics Branch or its successor
agency as authorized by KRS Chapter 213, or a provisional certificate of death as
described in KRS 213.076.
2. Any balance remaining in the fund after payment for the merchandise and services as set forth in
the agreement, contract, or plan shall be paid to the estate of the beneficiary of the agreement,
contract, or plan.
(2)[(4)] [The funds shall not be paid by the financial institution until the agent has proven the death of the
person for whose service the funds were paid by furnishing the financial institution with a verified or certified
copy of a record verifying the death, issued by the state registrar of the Vital Statistics Branch or its successor
agency as authorized by KRS Chapter 213, or a provisional certificate of death as described in KRS 213.076.
(5) No provision of ]KRS 367.932 to 367.974 shall not be construed to apply to contracts for funeral service or
merchandise sold as preneed and burial insurance policies which are regulated by the Department of Insurance
of this state.
Section 3. KRS 367.936 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Upon the giving of fifteen (15) days' written notice, sent to the agent and the trustee, any person,
partnership, or corporation who has paid funds for a preneed funeral service may demand a refund of
the entire amount actually paid, excluding an administrative fee imposed on a fully paid contract in
accordance with Section 1 of this Act, together with all interest, dividends, increases, or accretions, of
any kind whatsoever, which have been earned on such funds.
(b) 1. If the trustee is unknown, the written notice sent to the agent shall constitute compliance with
this subsection[section].
2. Upon receipt of notice, the agent shall immediately forward notice to the trustee.
(2) (a) The financial institutions shall be relieved from further liability, after making payment to the person
making payment of said funds, to the agent upon receipt of the foregoing written notice.
(b) Notice of payment of funds under this section shall be given by the financial institution to the agent.
(3) The trustee may rely upon all certifications and affidavits made pursuant to or required by the provisions of
KRS 367.932 to 367.974 and 367.991, and shall not be liable to any person for such reliance.
Section 4. This Act applies to contracts entered into on or after the effective date of this Act.
Signed by Governor April 10, 2026.